Massachusetts, session 194th, S1554.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 245. (a) The department shall require that the Massachusetts Tobacco Cessation
and Prevention Program provide counseling about lung cancer screening to individuals accessing
the Massachusetts Quitline.
(b) The Massachusetts Quitline shall: (i) evaluate the lung cancer screening eligibility for
all individuals contacting the Massachusetts Quitline; (ii) provide information about lung cancer
screening services; and (iii) report data to the department on the number of callers referred to
lung cancer screening.
SECTION 2. Section 7 of Chapter 270 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting the following subsection:-
of 2

(d) The department of public health shall develop signage providing referral information
on lung cancer screening. Signage shall include, but not be limited to: (i) information about who
is eligible for lung cancer screening and (ii) the toll-free telephone hotline defined in section 245
of chapter 111 of the General Laws. Retailers shall conspicuously post such signage in their
retail establishments.
SECTION 3. Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 25K the following section:-
Section 25K 1/2. The department shall develop an educational insert to accompany the
sale of tobacco products and nicotine replacement therapy. This educational insert shall include,
but not be limited to: (i) information on the effectiveness of lung cancer screening; (ii) eligibility
criteria for lung cancer screening; and (iii) the toll-free telephone numbers of the Massachusetts
Quitline defined in section 245 of chapter 111 of the General Laws. This educational insert shall
be provided at the point of sale to purchasers of tobacco products and nicotine replacement
therapy.
of 2